Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1621
Department; duties.

For the pilot program, the department shall provide enrollees at least two different direct primary care health plans including a high-deductible option and a low-deductible option for health care coverage outside of primary care. The department may include wellness incentives in the direct primary care health plans.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 4.